ja: オートバイのキドニーベルト構造タイプ: 通気性メッシュ構造; 伸縮性コンプレッションベルト; 一体型パッド; マルチパネルサポートベルト; 硬質バックサポートインサート; その他
nb: Konstruksjonstype for nyrebelte til motorsykkelbruk: Pustende nettingkonstruksjon; Elastisk kompresjonsbelte; Integrert polstring; Støttebelte med flere paneler; Stivt innlegg for ryggstøtte; Annet
hu: Motoros vesevédő öv szerkezeti típusa: Légáteresztő hálós szerkezet; Elasztikus kompressziós öv; Beépített párnázás; Többpaneles tartóöv; Merev hátmegtámasztó betét; Egyéb
vi: Loại đai bảo vệ thận dành cho xe mô tô: Cấu trúc lưới thoáng khí; Đai nén đàn hồi; Đệm tích hợp; Đai hỗ trợ đa mảnh; Lõi đệm lưng cứng; Khác
bg-BG: Тип конструкция на бъбречен колан за мотоциклет: Дишаща мрежеста конструкция; Еластичен компресионен колан; Вградена подплата; Многопанелен поддържащ колан; Твърда поддържаща вложка за гърба; Друго
es: Tipo de diseño de la faja lumbar para motocicleta: Construcción de malla transpirable; Cinturón de compresión elástico; Acolchado integrado; Cinturón de soporte de varios paneles; Inserto rígido de soporte para la espalda; Otro
ru: Тип конструкции мотоциклетного поясничного пояса: Дышащая сетчатая конструкция; Эластичный компрессионный пояс; Встроенная набивка; Многопанельный поддерживающий пояс; Жесткая вставка для поддержки спины; Другое
sk-SK: Konštrukčný typ bedrového pásu pre motocyklistov: Priedušná sieťovinová konštrukcia; Elastický kompresný pás; Integrované polstrovanie; Viacpanelový podporný pás; Pevná oporná vložka chrbta; Iné
fr: Type de construction de la ceinture lombaire de moto: Construction en maille respirante; Ceinture de compression élastique; Rembourrage intégré; Ceinture de maintien multi-panneaux; Insert de support dorsal rigide; Autre
sl-SI: Namen motorističnega ledvenega pasu: Konstrukcija iz zračne mrežice; Elastičen kompresijski pas; Integrirano oblazinjenje; Večdelni podporni pas; Trd vložek za podporo hrbta; Drugo
tr: Motosiklet böbrek kemeri yapım tipi: Nefes alabilen file yapı; Elastik kompresyon kemeri; Entegre dolgu; Çok panelli destek kemeri; Sert sırt destek parçası; Diğer
de: Konstruktionsart des Motorrad-Nierengurts: Atmungsaktive Mesh-Konstruktion; Elastischer Kompressionsgürtel; Integrierte Polsterung; Stützgürtel mit mehreren Einsätzen; Fester Rückenstütz-Einsatz; Sonstige
th: โครงสร้างแบบเข็มขัดพยุงไตสำหรับรถจักรยานยนต์: ผ้าตาข่ายระบายอากาศได้ดี; เข็มขัดรัดแบบยางยืด; การบุซับในในตัว; เข็มขัดพยุงหลังแบบหลายแผง; แผ่นพยุงหลังแบบแข็ง; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ konstrukcji pasa nerkowego motocykla: Oddychająca konstrukcja z siateczki; Elastyczny pas kompresyjny; Zintegrowana wyściółka; Wielopanelowy pas usztywniający; Sztywna wkładka podpierająca plecy; Inne
sv: Typ av njurbälte för motorcykel: Konstruktion i andningsbart nät; Elastiskt kompressionsbälte; Integrerad vaddering; Stödbälte med flera paneler; Styvt inlägg för ryggstöd; Övrigt
zh-CN: 摩托车护肾腰带结构类型: 透气网眼结构; 弹性压缩腰带; 一体式衬垫; 多面板支撑腰带; 刚性背部支撑嵌件; 其他
el: Τύπος κατασκευής ιμάντα νεφρού μοτοσικλέτας: Κατασκευή από διαπνέον πλέγμα; Ελαστική ζώνη συμπίεσης; Ενσωματωμένη επένδυση; Ζώνη υποστήριξης πολλαπλών πάνελ; Άκαμπτο ένθετο υποστήριξης πλάτης; Άλλο
pt-BR: Cinta lombar para motocicleta tipo de construção: Construção em malha respirável; Cinta elástica de compressão; Preenchimento integrado; Cinta de suporte multipainéis; Encarte rígido de suporte para as costas; Outros
lt-LT: Motociklo inkstų diržo konstrukcijos tipas: Kvėpuojanti tinklinė konstrukcija; Elastingas kompresinis diržas; Integruotas paminkštinimas; Kelių skydelių prilaikomasis diržas; Tvirtas nugaros atramos įdėklas; Kita
cs: Typ konstrukce ledvinového pásu motocyklu: Prodyšná konstrukce ze síťoviny; Elastický kompresní pás; Integrované polstrování; Vícepanelový nosný pás; Pevná vložka pro podporu zad; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta konstrukcije remena za bubrege motocikla: Prozračna mrežasta konstrukcija; Elastični kompresijski pojas; Integrirana podstava; Potporni pojas s više panela; Čvrsti umetak za potporu leđima; Ostalo
da: Konstruktionstype for nyrebælte til motorcykel: Åndbar mesh-konstruktion; Elastisk kompressionsbælte; Integreret polstring; Støttebælte med flere paneler; Stift indlæg til rygstøtte; Andet
fi: Moottoripyöräilijän munuaisvyön rakenne: Hengittävä verkkorakenne; Joustava kompressiovyö; Integroitu pehmuste; Monipaneelinen tukivyö; Jäykkä selkätukiosa; Muu
zh-TW: 機車護腰帶結構類型: 透氣網布結構; 彈性加壓帶; 整合式護墊; 多拼接支撐帶; 硬質背部支撐墊片; 其他
it: Tipo di struttura della fascia lombare da moto: Struttura in rete traspirante; Fascia a compressione elastica; Imbottitura integrata; Fascia di supporto multipannello; Inserto di supporto per la schiena rigido; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul de construcție al centurii lombare pentru motocicletă: Construcție din plasă respirabilă; Centură elastică de compresie; Căptușeală integrată; Centură de susținere cu mai multe panouri; Inserție rigidă de susținere a spatelui; Altele
pt-PT: tipo de construção do cinto de proteção renal para motociclo: Construção em malha respirável; Cinto de compressão elástico; Acolchoamento integrado; Cinto de suporte multipainéis; Encaixe rígido para suporte de costas; Outro
en: Motorcycle kidney belt construction type: Breathable mesh construction; Elastic compression belt; Integrated padding; Multi-panel support belt; Rigid back support insert; Other
nl: Motor niergordel constructietype: Ademende mesh-constructie; Elastische compressieband; Geïntegreerde vulling; Multi-paneel steunband; Stijve rugsteun-insert; Overig
ko: 오토바이 허리 보호대 구조 유형: 통기성 메시 구조; 탄력 압박 벨트; 일체형 패딩; 다중 패널 지지 벨트; 단단한 등받이 인서트; 기타